Utah statutes.
17-36-18.   Estimated revenue from property tax.

The amount of estimated revenue from property tax required by the budget shall constitute the basis for determination of the property tax to be levied for the corresponding tax year subject to legal limitations.



Enacted by Chapter 22, 1975 General Session

